Illinois, session 104th, SB794.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Firearm Concealed Carry Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-63, eff. 7-9-13.)